Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.150.240

Certificated teaching and administrative staff as accountable for classroom teaching—Scope—Responsibilities—Penalty.

(1) It is the intended purpose of this section to guarantee that the certificated teaching and administrative staff in each common school district be held accountable for the proper and efficient conduct of classroom teaching in their school which will provide students with the opportunity to achieve those skills which are generally recognized as requisite to learning.

(2) In conformance with the other provisions of Title 28A RCW, it shall be the responsibility of the certificated teaching and administrative staff in each common school to:

(a) Implement the district's prescribed curriculum and enforce, within their area of responsibility, the rules and regulations of the school district, the state superintendent of public instruction, and the state board of education, taking into due consideration individual differences among students, and maintain and render appropriate records and reports pertaining thereto.

(b) Maintain good order and discipline in their classrooms at all times.

(c) Hold students to a strict accountability while in school for any disorderly conduct while under their supervision.

(d) Require excuses from the parents, guardians, or custodians of minor students in all cases of absence, late arrival to school, or early dismissal.

(e) Give careful attention to the maintenance of a healthful atmosphere in the classroom.

(f) Give careful attention to the safety of the student in the classroom and report any doubtful or unsafe conditions to the building administrator.

(g) Evaluate each student's educational growth and development and make periodic reports thereon to parents, guardians, or custodians and to school administrators.

Failure to carry out such requirements as set forth in subsection (2)(a) through (g) above shall constitute sufficient cause for discharge of any member of such teaching or administrative staff.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 250 s 5; 1977 ex.s. c 359 s 19. Formerly RCW 28A.58.760.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1979 ex.s. c 250: See notes following RCW 28A.150.220.

Effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 359: See notes following RCW 28A.150.200.